Maryland, session 2026, HB1477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1477*

HOUSE BILL 1477
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. IBOGAINE CLINICAL RESEARCH GRANT PROGRAM.
13–5901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION” MEANS AN ENTITY:
(1) LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(2) WITH A HISTORY OF RESEARCH AND TREATMENT OF
NEUROLOGICAL DISEASES AND EXPERTISE IN SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER,
POST–TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER, OR TRAUMA;
(3) WITH A NEUROSURGERY PROGRAM WITH CLINICAL RESEARCH
FACILITIES THAT ARE:
(I) STAFFED BY PROFESSIONALS WITH EXPERTISE IN
NEUROLOGICAL AND NEUROSURGICAL CONDITIONS; AND
(II) CAPABLE OF PROVIDING THE NECESSARY
INFRASTRUCTURE AND EXPERTISE TO DELIVER CARDIAC INTENSIVE CARE
SERVICES; AND
(4) ABLE TO FACILITATE PIONEERING RESEARCH AND INNOVATION
IN THE DIAGNOSIS AND TREATMENT OF NEUROLOGICAL CONDITIONS.
(C) (1) “IBOGAINE” MEANS THE NATURALLY OCCURRING PSYCHOACTIVE
COMPOUND FOUND IN THE ROOT BARK OF THE IBOGA PLANT.
(2) “IBOGAINE” INCLUDES IBOGAINE–BASED THERAPEUTICS AND
IBOGAINE ANALOGS.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE IBOGAINE CLINICAL RESEARCH GRANT
PROGRAM.
13–5902.
(A) THERE IS AN IBOGAINE CLINICAL RESEARCH GRANT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1477 3
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE
RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS TO CONDUCT A CERTIFIED CLINICAL DRUG
DEVELOPMENT TRIAL OVERSEEN BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION
ON THE USE OF IBOGAINE FOR THE TREATMENT OF OPIOID USE DISORDER AND
OTHER NEUROLOGICAL CONDITIONS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND
MILITARY FAMILIES, ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROGRAM.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD UP TO THREE GRANTS TO
ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS EACH YEAR.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION SHALL PROVIDE
MATCHING FUNDS THAT ARE AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE GRANT AMOUNT AWARDED TO
THE ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION.
(E) (1) AN ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION MAY USE A GRANT
AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM ONLY TO CONDUCT A CERTIFIED CLINICAL DRUG
DEVELOPMENT TRIAL OVERSEEN BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION
ON THE USE OF IBOGAINE FOR THE TREATMENT OF:
(I) OPIOID USE DISORDER; AND
(II) ANY OTHER NEUROLOGICAL CONDITION FOR WHICH
IBOGAINE DEMONSTRATES EFFICACY.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION AWARDED A GRANT UNDER
THE PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT QUARTERLY:
(I) A REPORT ON THE PROGRESS OF THE CLINICAL DRUG
DEVELOPMENT TRIAL SUPPORTED BY THE GRANT; AND
(II) A FINANCIAL STATUS REPORT, INCLUDING INFORMATION
TO VERIFY EXPENDITURES OF GRANT FUNDS AND PROOF OF MATCHING FUNDS
PROVIDED BY THE ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION.
(3) AN ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION AWARDED A GRANT UNDER
THE PROGRAM MAY SIGN AN AGREEMENT WITH A CONSORTIUM ESTABLISHED BY

HOUSE BILL 1477
THE GOVERNMENT OF ANOTHER STATE FOR THE PURPOSE OF JOINING A CERTIFIED
CLINICAL DRUG DEVELOPMENT TRIAL OVERSEEN BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION ON THE USE OF IBOGAINE FOR THE TREATMENT OF:
(I) OPIOID USE DISORDER; AND
(II) ANY OTHER NEUROLOGICAL CONDITION FOR WHICH
IBOGAINE DEMONSTRATES EFFICACY.
(F) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2030, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000
FROM THE OPIOID RESTITUTION FUND FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) (I) THE NUMBER OF GRANTS AWARDED;
(II) THE VALUE OF EACH GRANT AWARDED; AND
(III) THE ELIGIBLE RESEARCH INSTITUTION TO WHICH EACH
GRANT WAS AWARDED;
(2) THE PROGRESS OF THE CLINICAL DRUG DEVELOPMENT TRIALS
SUPPORTED BY A GRANT AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) THE FINANCIAL STATUS OF THE CLINICAL DRUG DEVELOPMENT
TRIALS SUPPORTED BY A GRANT AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–331.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Opioid Restitution Fund.
(b) There is an Opioid Restitution Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to retain the amount of settlement revenues
deposited to the Fund in accordance with subsection (e)(1) of this section.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1477 5
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all revenues received by the State from any source resulting, directly or
indirectly, from any judgment against, or settlement with, opioid manufacturers, opioid
research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry relating to any claims
made or prosecuted by the State to recover damages for violations of State law; and
(2) the interest earnings of the Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only to provide funds for the purposes specified in
settlement agreements and judgments relating to claims by the State against opioid
manufacturers, opioid research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry for
violations of State law, including:
(1) programs, services, supports, and resources for evidence–based
substance use disorder prevention, treatment, recovery, or harm reduction;
(2) supporting community–based nonprofit recovery organizations that
provide nonclinical substance use recovery support services in the State;
(3) addressing racial disparities in access to prevention, harm reduction,
treatment, and recovery support services;
(4) addressing socioeconomic disparities in access to prevention, harm
reduction, treatment, and recovery support services;
(5) evidence–informed substance use disorder prevention, treatment
recovery, or harm reduction pilot programs or demonstration studies that are not
evidence–based if the Opioid Restitution Fund Advisory Council, established under §
7.5–902 of the Health – General Article:
(i) determines that emerging evidence supports the distribution of
money for the pilot program or that there is a reasonable basis for funding the
demonstration study with the expectation of creating an evidence–based program; and
(ii) approves the use of money for the pilot program or demonstration
study;
(6) evaluations of the effectiveness and outcomes reporting for substance
use disorder abatement infrastructure, programs, services, supports, and resources for
which money from the Fund was used, including evaluations of the impact on access to
harm reduction services or treatment for substance use disorders and the reduction in
drug–related mortality;

HOUSE BILL 1477
(7) operating expenses and personnel costs for investigations, enforcement
actions, and other activities conducted by the Opioids Enforcement Unit within the Office
of the Attorney General that are related to the recovery of funds from opioid–related
judgments or settlements; [and]
(8) the Buprenorphine Training Grant Program established under §
13–5802 of the Health – General Article; AND
(9) THE IBOGAINE CLINICAL RESEARCH GRANT PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–5902 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of September
30, 2031, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.